Massachusetts, session 194th, H3710.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting in line 54 after the word “vehicle,” the following sentence:- which
shall also include a module on the science related to the impairment effects of marijuana.
of 1